Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB839.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Media Literacy Education.--(a) The Department of Education, in consultation with the State Board of Education, shall develop, within twelve (12) months of the effective date of this section, an age-appropriate model curriculum for students in kindergarten through grade twelve for media literacy instruction. Beginning with the school year that commences after the effective date of this section, a school district shall incorporate into the school curriculum a component regarding media literacy.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) The curriculum may include, but need not be limited to:(1) developing critical thinking skills;(2) understanding how media messages shape culture and society;(3) identifying target-marketing strategies;(4) naming techniques of persuasion used;(5) recognizing bias and misinformation;(6) discovering parts of a story that are not being told; and(7) evaluating media messages based on personal experiences, skills, beliefs and values.(c) The Department of Education shall make the curriculum, a list of resources and other available material on media literacy available on its publicly accessible Internet website.(d) The Department of Education shall ensure that approved media literacy training opportunities are made available for use in professional development programs for teachers.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0839PN0913 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718